North Carolina, session 2025, SB555.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. FUNDING
SECTION 1.(a) Establishment and Purpose of Fund. – The sum of fifteen million
dollars ($15,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Environmental Quality. Funds appropriated by this section
shall be used by the Department to establish the Wetlands Restoration and Protection Fund
(Fund) as a special fund in the Department. The Fund consists of appropriations by the General
Assembly as well as contributions and grants from public or private sources. The purpose of the
Fund is to provide financial support for (i) wetland restoration projects, (ii) acquisition of
conservation easements, (iii) public awareness campaigns to educate citizens about the
importance of wetlands and the need for their protection and opportunities for volunteer wetlands
protection and restoration projects, through the Department's Office of Environmental Education
and Public Affairs, and (iv) enforcement of wetland protection laws as amended by Section 2 of
this act to restore protection of certain wetlands in the State that were removed from federal
protection under the Clean Water Act by the United States Supreme Court ruling in Sackett v.
EPA, 598 U.S. 651 (2023).
SECTION 1.(b) Reservation of Funds for Monitoring and Research. – Five million
dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds appropriated by subsection (a) of this section are designated for
wetland monitoring and research initiatives. The Department, in collaboration with relevant
stakeholders and research institutions, will conduct comprehensive monitoring and research to
assess the health and ecological value of wetlands throughout the State.
SECTION 1.(c) Report. – The Department shall submit a report no later than
September 1, 2026, and annually thereafter to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division on the
projects and activities funded by this act during the prior fiscal year. The Department shall
include in its initial report and may include in subsequent reports recommendations regarding
further legislative changes needed to provide comprehensive protection for isolated wetlands at
the State level in response to the Sackett decision. The reports shall also include, at a minimum,
the following:
(1) The beginning and ending balance of the Fund for the fiscal year.
(2) A listing of funding recipients, and the amount provided to each recipient.
(3) An overview of the use of funds by funding recipients, including a description
of projects constructed or planning milestones achieved.
*S555-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The findings of the monitoring and research efforts funded under subsection
(b) of this section and how they have informed wetland conservation strategies
and regulatory decisions by the Department.

PART II. PROTECTION OF ISOLATED WETLANDS
SECTION 2.(a) Section 54 of S.L. 2014-120 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) Section 4.18 of S.L. 2015-286 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 143-212 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-212. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions apply to this
Article and Articles 21A and 21B of this Chapter:
…
(3a) "Isolated wetlands" means (i) wetlands confirmed to be isolated by the United
States Army Corps of Engineers prior to June 22, 2020, and (ii) wetlands
described as isolated in the North Carolina Wetland Assessment User Manual
prepared by the North Carolina Wetland Functional Assessment Team,
version 4.1, October 2010. The term "isolated wetland" does not include an
isolated man-made ditch or pond constructed for stormwater management
purposes or any other man-made isolated pond.
…
(6) "Waters" means any stream, river, brook, swamp, lake, sound, tidal estuary,
bay, creek, reservoir, waterway, waterway, wetland, or other body or
accumulation of water, whether surface or underground, public or private, or
natural or artificial, that is contained in, flows through, or borders upon any
portion of this State, including any portion of the Atlantic Ocean over which
the State has jurisdiction.
(7) "Wetland" means waters that are areas that are inundated or saturated by an
accumulation of surface or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient
to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of
vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands do
not include prior converted cropland as defined in the National Food Security
Act Manual, Fifth Edition. Wetlands classified as waters of the State are
limited to (i) waters of the United States as defined by 33 C.F.R. § 328.3 and
40 C.F.R. § 230.3 and (ii) isolated wetlands."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 555-First Edition